Washington statutes.
RCW 24.36.410

Marketing contracts with members.

An association and its members may make and execute marketing contracts, requiring the members to sell, for any period of time, not over fifteen years, all or any specified part of their fishery products or specified commodities exclusively to or through the association or any facilities to be created by the association.

[ 1959 c 312 s 41.]